fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Metsästys ja ammunta > Metsästys > Metsästyskoiratarvikkeet: Linnunheittimet metsästyskoirille; Metsästyskoiran kaulapannat; Metsästyskoirien valjaat; Metsästyskoiran hihnat; Metsästyskoirien telineet ja alustat; Metsästyskoirien seurantalaitteet; Metsästyskoiran koulutusnuket; Metsästyskoirien liivit
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Jagen und Schießen > Jagd > Jagdhund-Ausrüstung: Vogelwerfer für Jagdhunde; Halsbänder für Jagdhunde; Jagdhund-Geschirre; Jagdhundeleinen; Stände & Plattformen für Jagdhunde; Ortungsgeräte für Jagdhunde; Trainingsdummies für Jagdhunde; Jagdhund-Westen
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Caza y tiro > Caza > Equipo para perro de caza: Lanzadores de aves para adiestramiento de perros de caza; Collares para perros de caza; Arneses para perros de caza; Correas para perros de caza; Soportes y plataformas para perros de caza; Dispositivos de rastreo para perros de caza; Maniquíes de entrenamiento para perros de caza; Chalecos para perros de caza
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Avcılık ve Atıcılık > Avcılık > Av Köpeği Malzemeleri: Av köpeği kuş fırlatıcıları; Av Köpek Tasmaları; Av köpeği göğüs tasmaları; Av Köpeği Tasmaları; Av köpeği standları ve platformları; Av köpeği takip cihazları; Av Köpeği Eğitim Mankenleri; Av köpeği yelekleri
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lov a střelba > Lov > Potřeby pro lovecké psy: Vrhačky ptáků pro výcvik loveckých psů; Obojky pro lovecké psy; Postroje pro lovecké psy; Vodítka pro lovecké psy; Stojany a plošiny pro lovecké psy; Sledovací zařízení pro lovecké psy; Figuríny pro výcvik loveckých psů; Vesty pro lovecké psy
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การล่าสัตว์และยิงปืน > มีดพราน > อุปกรณ์สำหรับสุนัขล่าสัตว์: เครื่องปล่อยนกสำหรับฝึกสุนัขล่าสัตว์; ปลอกคอสุนัขล่าสัตว์; สายรัดอกสุนัขล่าสัตว์; สายจูงสุนัขล่าสัตว์; แท่นยืนและแพลตฟอร์มสำหรับสุนัขล่าสัตว์; อุปกรณ์ติดตามสุนัขล่าสัตว์; หุ่นฝึกสุนัขล่าสัตว์; เสื้อกั๊กสุนัขล่าสัตว์
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Vânătoare și tir > Vânătoare > Echipament pentru câini de vânătoare: Lansatoare de păsări pentru antrenamentul câinilor de vânătoare; Zgărzi pentru câini de vânătoare; Hamuri pentru câini de vânătoare; Lese pentru câini de vânătoare; Platforme și suporturi pentru câini de vânătoare; Dispozitive de urmărire pentru câini de vânătoare; Manechine de dresaj pentru câini de vânătoare; Veste pentru câini de vânătoare
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Охота и стрельба > Охота > Снаряжение для охотничьих собак: Катапульты для птиц для тренировки охотничьих собак; Ошейники для охотничьих собак; Шлейки для охотничьих собак; Поводки для охотничьих собак; Стенды и платформы для охотничьих собак; Устройства слежения за охотничьими собаками; Поноски для дрессировки охотничьих собак; Жилеты для охотничьих собак
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Κυνήγι & σκοποβολή > Κυνήγι > Εξοπλισμός για κυνηγετικά σκυλιά: Εκτοξευτές πουλιών για κυνηγετικούς σκύλους; Περιλαίμια κυνηγετικών σκύλων; Επιστήθια κυνηγετικών σκύλων; Λουριά κυνηγετικών σκύλων; Βάσεις και πλατφόρμες για σκύλους κυνηγιού; Συσκευές εντοπισμού κυνηγετικών σκύλων; Εκπαιδευτικά ομοιώματα για κυνηγετικά σκυλιά; Γιλέκα κυνηγετικών σκύλων
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Jagen en schieten > Jagen > Uitrustingen voor jachthonden: Vogellanceerders voor jachthonden; Halsbanden voor jachthonden; Jachthondenharnassen; Riemen voor jachthonden; Standaards en platforms voor jachthonden; Volgapparaten voor jachthonden; Trainingspoppen voor jachthonden; Jachthondenvesten
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Vadászat és lövészet > Vadászat > Vadászkutya-felszerelés: Vadászkutya-madárkilövők; Vadászkutyanyakörvek; Vadászkutya-hámok; Vadászkutyapórázok; Vadászkutya-állványok és -platformok; Vadászkutya-nyomkövető eszközök; Vadászkutya-kiképző bábuk; Vadászkutyamellények
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 打猎与射击 > 狩猎用品 > 猎犬用具: 猎犬放鸟器; 猎犬项圈; 猎犬背带; 猎犬狗链; 猎犬站台与平台; 猎犬追踪设备; 猎犬训练仿制品; 猎犬背心
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Лов и стрелба > Лов > Оборудване за ловни кучета: Устройства за изстрелване на птици за ловни кучета; Нашийници за ловни кучета; Каишки за ловни кучета; Каишки за ловни кучета; Платформи и стойки за ловни укрития; Проследяващи устройства на ловни кучета; Тренировъчни манекени за обучение на ловни кучета; Жилетки за ловни кучета
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Lov in streljanje > Lov > Oprema za lovske pse: Izmetniki ptic za trening lovskih psov; Ovratnice za lovske pse; Oprsnice za lovske pse; Povodci za lovske pse; Stojala in platforme za lovske pse; Sledilne naprave za lovske pse; Lutke za šolanje lovskih psov; Telovniki za lovske pse
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Lov i streljaštvo > Lov > Oprema za lovačke pse: Bacači ptica za lovačke pse; Ogrlice za lovačke pse; Pojasevi za lovačke pse; Povodci za lovačke pse; Stajališta i platforme za lovačke pse; Uređaji za praćenje za lovačke pse; Lutke za dresuru lovačkih pasa; Prsluci za lovačke pse
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Jagt og skydning > Jagt > Jagthundeudstyr: Fuglekastere til jagthunde; Halsbånd til jagthunde; Seler til jagthunde; Snore til jagthunde; Stande og platforme til jagthunde; Sporingsenheder til jagthunde; Træningsdukker til jagthunde; Veste til jagthunde
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Poľovníctvo a streľba > Poľovníctvo > Vybavenie pre poľovníckych psov: Odpaľovače vtákov pre poľovné psy; Obojky pre poľovníckych psov; Postroje pre poľovné psy; Vodítka pre poľovníckych psov; Stojančeky a podstavce pre lovecké psy; Sledovacie zariadenia pre lovecké psy; Figuríny na výcvik poľovníckych psov; Vesty pre lovecké psy
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 狩猟・射撃 > 狩猟 > 狩猟犬用品: 狩猟犬用バードランチャー; 狩猟犬の首輪; 狩猟犬用ハーネス; 狩猟犬のリード; 狩猟犬用スタンド＆プラットフォーム; 狩猟犬用トラッキングデバイス; 狩猟犬訓練用ダミー; 狩猟犬用ベスト
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 사냥/사격 > 사냥 > 사냥견 장비: 사냥개용 새 발사기; 사냥견 목줄; 사냥개용 하네스; 사냥견 리드줄; 사냥개용 스탠드 및 플랫폼; 사냥개 추적 장치; 사냥견 훈련용 모형; 사냥개용 조끼
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Hunting & Shooting > Hunting > Hunting Dog Equipment: Hunting Dog Bird Launchers; Hunting Dog Collars; Hunting Dog Harnesses; Hunting Dog Leashes; Hunting Dog Stands & Platforms; Hunting Dog Tracking Devices; Hunting Dog Training Dummies; Hunting Dog Vests
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Jakt och skytte > Jakt > Utrustning för jakthundar: Fågelkastare för jakthundar; Halsband för jakthundar; Selar för jakthundar; Koppel för jakthundar; Stativ och plattformar för jakthundar; Spårningsenheter för jakthundar; Dockor för jakthundträning; Västar för jakthundar
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Caccia e tiro a segno > Caccia > Attrezzatura per cani da caccia: Lanciatori per addestramento cani da caccia; Collari per cani da caccia; Pettorine per cani da caccia; Guinzagli per cani da caccia; Supporti e piattaforme per cani da caccia; Dispositivi di tracciamento per cani da caccia; Manichini da addestramento per cani da caccia; Gilet per cani da caccia
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 打獵和射擊 > 狩獵 > 獵犬裝備: 獵犬拋鳥機; 獵犬項圈; 獵犬胸背帶; 獵犬牽繩; 獵犬看台與平台; 獵犬追蹤裝置; 獵犬訓練假人; 獵犬背心
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Chasse et tir > Chasse > Accessoires pour chiens de chasse: Lanceurs d’oiseaux pour chiens de chasse; Colliers pour chiens de chasse; Harnais pour chiens de chasse; Laisses pour chiens de chasse; Postes et plateformes pour chiens de chasse; Dispositifs de repérage pour chiens de chasse; Mannequins de dressage de chiens de chasse; Gilets pour chiens de chasse
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Jakt og skyting > Jakt > Utstyr for jakthunder: Fuglekastere for jakthunder; Hundehalsbånd for jakt; Seler for jakthunder; Hundebånd for jakt; Stativer og plattformer for jakthunder; Sporingsenheter for jakthunder; Treningsdukker for jakthunder; Vester for jakthunder
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Săn bắn > Dao đi săn > Thiết bị cho chó đi săn: Máy phóng chim huấn luyện chó săn; Vòng cổ chó săn; Đai yếm cho chó săn; Dây dắt chó săn; Bệ & bục cho chó săn; Thiết bị theo dõi chó săn; Hình nộm huấn luyện chó săn; Áo cho chó săn
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Medžioklė ir šaudymas > Medžioklė > Įranga medžiokliniams šunims: Paukščių paleidimo įrenginiai medžiokliniams šunims treniruoti; Medžioklinių šunų antkakliai; Medžioklinių šunų petnešos; Medžioklinių šunų pavadėliai; Medžioklinių šunų stovai ir platformos; Medžioklės šunų sekimo įrenginiai; Medžioklinių šunų dresavimo manekenai; Medžioklės šunų liemenės
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Caça e tiro > Caça > Equipamentos para cães de caça: Lançadores de aves para cães de caça; Coleiras para cães de caça; Peitorais para cães de caça; Guias para cães de caça; Suportes e plataformas para cães de caça; Dispositivos de rastreamento para cães de caça; Bonecos para treinamento para cães de caça; Coletes para cães de caça
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Caça e tiro > Caça > Equipamento para cães de caça: Lançadores de aves para treino de cães de caça; Coleiras para cães de caça; Arneses para cães de caça; Trelas para cães de caça; Suportes e plataformas para cães de caça; Dispositivos de localização para cães de caça; Bonecos para treino de cães de caça; Coletes para cães de caça
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Myślistwo i strzelectwo > Łowiectwo > Sprzęt dla psów myśliwskich: Wyrzutnie ptaków do szkolenia psów myśliwskich; Obroże dla psów myśliwskich; Szelki dla psów myśliwskich; Smycze dla psów myśliwskich; Stojaki i platformy dla psów myśliwskich; Obroże GPS i urządzenia śledzące dla psów myśliwskich; Manekiny do szkolenia psów myśliwskich; Kamizelki dla psów myśliwskich